test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-ruottad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kulgâđ: # not checked

    ruottâđ+V+Inf: ruottâđ
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: ruottuđ
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ryáttuum
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ryáttuuh
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruettoo
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ruáttojeen
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: ryáttuuvettee
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: ryáttuv
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ryáttup
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ryáttuuvetteđ
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ruettojeh
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ruettojim
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ruettojih
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ryettui
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: ryettuim
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: ryettuid
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: ryettuin
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ryettuim
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ryettuid
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ruettojii
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: ryáttuuččim
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: ryáttuuččih
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: ryáttuuččij
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: ryáttuuččáim
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: ryáttuuččáid
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: ryáttuuččáin
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: ryáttuuččijm
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: ryáttuuččijd
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: ryáttuuččii
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: ryettuužeem
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: ryettuužeeh
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: ryátuš
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: ryettuužeen
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: ryátušvettee
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: ryettuužává
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: ryettuužep
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: ryátušvetteđ
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: ryettuužeh
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ryáttuu
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ryáttum
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: ryettuuččii
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: ryettuužii
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: xxxx
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: ryáttum
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: ryettum
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: ryáttum
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: ryettuumin
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: ryettuumist
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: ryettuumân
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: xxxx
    ruottâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: ryettuuhánnáá
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruotâdâm
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ruotâdah
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruotâd
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ruotâdeen
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: ruotâdvettee
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: ruotâdává
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ruotâdeh
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ruotâd
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ruotâdim
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ruotâdij
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ruotâdii
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: ruotâdiččim
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: ruotâdičij
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: ruotâdižžeem
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: ruotâdiš
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ruotâd
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ruotâdâm
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: ruotâdižžii
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: ruotâdâm
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: ruotâdhánnáá
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: ruotâdem
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: ruotâdmân
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: ruotâdmin
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: ruotâdmist
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: ruotâddijn
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: ruotâddijnân
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: ruotâddijnâd
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: ruotâddijnis
    ruottâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: ruotâdtijn
    ruottâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ryetâstâm
    ruottâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ryetâttâm
    ruottâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruotâškuáđám
    ruottâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ryetâlâm
    ruottâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ryettâl
    ruottâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ryetâleen
    ruottâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ryetâleh
    ruottâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ryettâl
    ruottâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ryetâlim
    ruottâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ryetâlij
    ruottâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ryetâlii

  Verb - vuoiŋâđ: # MLO, checked

    vuoiŋâđ+V+Inf: vuoiŋâđ
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuoiŋuum
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáiŋoo
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vuáiŋojeen
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuáiŋojeh
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vuoiŋuu
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuáiŋojim
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuoiŋui
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuáiŋojii
